Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.8021

Exemption—Solicitation for Washington state flag account.

This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee from soliciting and accepting contributions to the Washington state flag account created in RCW 43.07.388.

[ 2009 c 71 s 3.]